Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 173.500 is amended to read:
173.500. (1)(a) There is established the Oregon State Capitol Foundation. The  foundation shall
be composed of not fewer than nine  and not more than 25 voting directors, who shall each serve a
term of four years. The President of the  Senate shall appoint  not more than  three voting directors
from members of the Senate.  The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint not more
than three voting directors from members of the House of Representatives. [ The Legislative Ad-
ministration Committee] The voting directors  shall appoint [ the] all remaining voting directors  who
were not  appointed by the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of Repre-
sentatives. A voting director is eligible for reappointment. In order to ensure  that the founda-
tion has authority to act under subsection (6) of this section, the appointing authority may
appoint a new voting director or reappoint an existing voting director upon a vacancy oc-
curring or at any time within six months preceding the expiration of the term  of a voting
director.
(b) The foundation may appoint honorary, nonvoting members to the foundation.
[(b)] (c)  The foundation shall elect a chair from among  the voting directors of the foundation.
A voting director shall serve as chair for a two-year term and may thereafter be reelected as  chair,
except that:
(A) The foundation may replace a chair by majority vote of  the voting directors of  the foun-
dation; and
(B) A chair must at all times be a voting director of the foundation.
(2) The Oregon State Capitol Foundation shall:
(a) Advise the Legislative Administration Committee on the terms and conditions of  contracts
or agreements entered into under ORS 276.002.
(b) Recommend to the committee renovations, repairs and additions to the State Capitol.
(c) Recommend to the committee exhibits and events for the State Capitol.
(d) Deposit gifts, grants, donations and moneys  converted from gifts or donations of other than
money into separate trust accounts reserved for the purposes of the gifts, grants and donations.
(e) Develop, maintain and implement plans to:
(A) Enhance  and embellish the State Capitol in keeping with the design and purpose of the
building and adjacent areas; and
Enrolled House Bill 2269 (HB 2269-A) Page 1
(B) Preserve the history of activities of state government that have occurred in the State Capi-
tol and of persons who have participated in state government in the State Capitol.
(f) Establish such  funds and accounts as are reasonably prudent for a nonprofit corporation of
the scope and mission of the foundation.
[(g) Consult  with any advisory committees the Legislative Administration Committee may designate
before the foundation makes a recommendation required by this subsection. ]
(3) The Oregon State Capitol Foundation may:
(a) Solicit and accept gifts, grants  and donations from public and private sources in the name
of the foundation.
(b) Convert gifts or donations other than money into moneys.
(c) Advise and educate  in relation to changes in statutory law [ or adopted policy of the Legisla-
tive Administration Committee ] in order to implement or promote the policies and  objectives of the
foundation, except that such advice and education is limited to:
(A) Activities permitted within the limits afforded to organizations established under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(B) Advice or education undertaken by the foundation that furthers  the purposes of the foun-
dation under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The  Oregon State Capitol Foundation shall cause an independent audit to be performed [ an-
nually] biennially of  all foundation finances. The auditor shall prepare [ an annual ] a biennial  fi-
nancial report according to generally accepted accounting principles and shall submit the  report to
the foundation [ and the Legislative Administration Committee ].
(5) The chair of the Oregon State Capitol Foundation  may enter into contracts to carry out
those functions and policies of the foundation for which the foundation has granted  the chair con-
tract authority. ORS 279.835 to 279.855 and ORS chapters 279A,  279B and 279C do not apply to a
contract or agreement entered into by the foundation. [ The chair  may delegate the contracting au-
thority granted under this subsection to the Legislative Administrator. ]
(6) The Oregon State Capitol Foundation may take  action under this section upon a majority
vote of a quorum of voting directors. A majority of the voting directors of the foundation  consti-
tutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
[(7) Notwithstanding ORS 171.072, directors  or nonvoting members of the foundation who are
members of the Legislative Assembly are not entitled to mileage expenses or a per diem and serve as
volunteers on the foundation. ]
[(8)] (7)  The Oregon State Capitol Foundation may adopt its own rules and bylaws and  is not
subject to the rules of either house of the  Legislative Assembly or Mason’s Manual of Legislative
Procedure. The foundation shall adopt rules and  bylaws to guide the foundation and implement the
foundation’s responsibilities under this section.
[(9)] (8) The Oregon State Capitol Foundation is not a part of the  legislative department as de-
fined in ORS 174.114 or a public body as defined in ORS 174.109. For purposes of ORS chapter 244,
neither the Oregon State Capitol Foundation nor any director or nonvoting member of the founda-
tion may be considered to have a legislative or administrative interest.
[(10) The Legislative Administrator shall  provide meeting space and administrative support for the
Oregon State Capitol Foundation. ]
SECTION 2.
 ORS 173.720 is amended to read:
173.720. (1) Pursuant to the policies and directions of the Legislative Administration Committee,
the Legislative Administrator shall:
(a) Coordinate administrative operations of the Legislative Assembly in order to  ensure efficient
work flow.
(b) Develop standard formats for legislative manuals and interim committee reports.
(c) Review legislative organization, rules and procedure in  cooperation with the Legislative
Counsel with the intent of modernizing legislative operations.
Enrolled House Bill 2269 (HB 2269-A) Page 2
(d) Conduct a continuing  study of possible applications of technological changes and improve-
ments, such as data processing and electronic equipment, to improve legislative  procedures, and
when considered advisable, make recommendations to adopt such applications.
(e) Arrange for  and coordinate orientation conferences for members of the Legislative Assembly
that shall  include, but need not be limited to, education about recycling programs available in the
State Capitol.
(f) Study and make recommendations on legislative compensation and working conditions.
(g) Control all space and facilities within the State Capitol and such other space as is  assigned
to the Legislative Assembly.
(h) Direct renovation and repair of the State Capitol, renovation, repair  and replacement of
State Capitol  fixtures and facilities, and artistic and other aesthetic improvements to the State
Capitol and adjacent areas.
(i) Perform  administrative service functions for the Legislative Assembly, including but not
limited to  accounting, data processing, personnel administration, printing, supply, space allocation
and property management.
(j) Arrange for  the printing and distribution of legislative manuals and interim committee re-
ports.
(k) Establish fee schedules for legislative measures, calendars, indexes and digests.
(L) Coordinate  the use of legislative supplies, materials, equipment and other property by legis-
lative interim committees and by standing committees and offices of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Pursuant to the policies and  directions of the Legislative Administration Committee, the
Legislative Administrator may enter into contracts to carry out the functions of the Legislative
Administrator.
(3) The Legislative Administrator may solicit and accept gifts, grants  and donations from
the Oregon  State Capitol Foundation and other public and private sources for purposes of
carrying out subsection (1)(h) of this section.
SECTION 3.
ORS 173.505 and 173.515 are repealed.
SECTION 4. (1) Any moneys remaining in  the Oregon State Capitol Foundation Operating
Fund on the effective date of this 2025 Act  that are unexpended, unobligated and not subject
to any conditions shall be transferred to the Oregon State Capitol Foundation.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Oregon Capitol History Gateway  Fund on the effective
date of this 2025  Act that are unexpended, unobligated and not subject to any conditions shall
be transferred to the Oregon State Capitol Foundation.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2269 (HB 2269-A) Page 3
Passed by House April 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2269 (HB 2269-A) Page 4